District of Columbia statutes.
42-509

Reversions.

A reversion is the residue of an estate left in the grantor who has conveyed, or in the heirs of the devisor who has devised a particular estate less than his own, and which residue returns to his or their possession on the expiration of the particular estate.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1351, ch. 854, § 1019

History

1981 Ed., § 45-209.
1973 Ed., § 45-809.

Prior Codifications